latvian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +N      ! noun
    +V      ! verb
    +Adj    ! adjective
    +Sg     ! singular
    +Pl     ! plural
    +Nom    ! nominative
    +Gen    ! genitive
    +Dat    ! dative
    +Acc    ! accusative
    +Loc    ! locative
    +Com    ! comperative
    +Sup    ! superlative
    +Pr     ! present
    +Pa     ! past
    +Fu     ! future
    +3P     ! third person

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;
    Adjectives ;
    Verbs ;

!
! NOUNS start here
!

LEXICON Nouns
    zēns: zēn N1dekl_s ;
    brālis: brāl N2dekl_is ;
    suns: sun N2dekl_s ;
    medus: med N3dekl ;
    grāmata: grāmat N4dekl ;
    saule: saul N5dekl ;
    nakts: nakt N6dekl ;

! 1.deklinācija

LEXICON N1dekl_s
    +N+Sg+Nom: s # ;
    +N+Sg: 0 N1deklSg ;
    +N+Pl: 0 N123deklPl ;

LEXICON N1dekl_š
    +N+Sg+Nom: š # ;
    +N+Sg: 0 N1deklSg ;
    +N+Pl: 0 N123deklPl ;

LEXICON N1deklSg
    +Gen: a # ;
    +Dat: am # ;
    +Acc: u # ;
    +Loc: ā # ;

! 2.deklinācija

LEXICON N2dekl_is
    +N+Sg+Nom: is # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen: *a # ;
    +N+Sg: 0 N2deklSg ;
    +N+Pl: * N123deklPl ;

LEXICON N2dekl_s
    +N+Sg+Nom: s # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen: s # ;
    +N+Sg: 0 N2deklSg ;
    +N+Pl: * N123deklPl ;

LEXICON N2deklSg
    +Dat: im # ;
    +Acc: i # ;
    +Loc: ī # ;

! 3.deklinācija

LEXICON N3dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom: us # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen: us # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat: um # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc: u # ;
    +N+Sg+Loc: ū # ;
    +N+Pl: N123deklPl ;

! 1., 2., 3.deklinācija daudzsk.

LEXICON N123deklPl
    +Nom: i # ;
    +Gen: u # ;
    +Dat: iem # ;
    +Acc: us # ;
    +Loc: os # ;

! 4.deklinācija

LEXICON N4dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom: a # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen: as # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat: ai # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc: u # ;
    +N+Sg+Loc: ā # ;
    +N+Pl+Nom: as # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen: u # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat: ām # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc: as # ;
    +N+Pl+Loc: ām # ;

! 5.deklinācija

LEXICON N5dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom: e # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen: es # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat: ei # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc: i # ;
    +N+Sg+Loc: ē # ;
    +N+Pl+Nom: es # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen: *u # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat: em # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc: es # ;
    +N+Pl+Loc: ēs # ;

! 6.deklinācija

LEXICON N6dekl
    +N+Sg+Nom: s # ;
    +N+Sg+Gen: s # ;
    +N+Sg+Dat: ij # ;
    +N+Sg+Acc: i # ;
    +N+Sg+Loc: ī # ;
    +N+Pl+Nom: is # ;
    +N+Pl+Gen: *u # ;
    +N+Pl+Dat: īm # ;
    +N+Pl+Acc: is # ;
    +N+Pl+Loc: īs # ;

!
! ADJECTIVES start here
!

LEXICON Adjectives
    jauns: jaun AMascIndef_s ;
    zaļš: zaļ AMascIndef_š ;
    skaista: skaist AFemIndef_a ;

LEXICON AMascIndef_s
    +Adj: 0 AMascIndef ;
    +Adj+Sg+Nom: s # ;
    +Adj+Comp: āk AMascIndef ;
    +Adj+Comp+Sg+Nom: āks # ;
    +Adj+Sup: āk AMascDef ;

LEXICON AMascIndef_š
    +Adj: 0 AMascIndef ;
    +Adj+Sg+Nom: š # ;
    +Adj+Comp: āk AMascIndef ;
    +Adj+Comp+Sg+Nom: āks # ;
    +Adj+Sup: āk AMascDef ;

LEXICON AFemIndef_a
    +Adj: 0 AFemIndef ;
    +Adj+Comp: āk AFemIndef ;
    +Adj+Sup: āk AFemDef ;

LEXICON AMascIndef
    +Sg+Gen: ā # ;
    +Sg+Dat: ajam # ;
    +Sg+Acc: o # ;
    +Sg+Loc: ajā # ;
    +Pl+Nom: i # ;
    +Pl+Gen: o # ;
    +Pl+Dat: ajiem # ;
    +Pl+Acc: os # ;
    +Pl+Loc: ajos # ;

LEXICON AMascDef
    +Sg+Nom: ais # ;
    +Sg+Gen: ā # ;
    +Sg+Dat: ajam # ;
    +Sg+Acc: o # ;
    +Sg+Loc: ajā # ;
    +Pl+Nom: ie # ;
    +Pl+Gen: o # ;
    +Pl+Dat: ajiem # ;
    +Pl+Acc: os # ;
    +Pl+Loc: ajos # ;

LEXICON AFemIndef
    +Sg+Nom: a # ;
    +Sg+Gen: as # ;
    +Sg+Dat: ai # ;
    +Sg+Acc: u # ;
    +Sg+Loc: ā # ;
    +Pl+Nom: as # ;
    +Pl+Gen: u # ;
    +Pl+Dat: ām # ;
    +Pl+Acc: as # ;
    +Pl+Loc: ās # ;

LEXICON AFemDef
    +Sg+Nom: ā # ;
    +Sg+Gen: ās # ;
    +Sg+Dat: ajai # ;
    +Sg+Acc: o # ;
    +Sg+Loc: ajā # ;
    +Pl+Nom: ās # ;
    +Pl+Gen: o # ;
    +Pl+Dat: ajām # ;
    +Pl+Acc: ās # ;
    +Pl+Loc: ajām # ;

!
! VERBS start here
!

! First person singular and plural

LEXICON Verbs
    vērot: vēroJ Conj2 ;
    rakstīt: rakstĪJ Conj3 ;
    lasīt: lasĪJ Conj3 ;

LEXICON Conj2
    +V+Sg+Pa: ^^u # ;
    +V+Sg+Pr: ^^u # ;
    +V+Sg+Fu: šu # ;
    +V+Pl+Pa: ^^ām # ;
    +V+Pl+Pr: ^^am # ;
    +V+Pl+Fu: sim # ;

LEXICON Conj3
    +V+Sg+Pa: ^^u # ;
    +V+Sg+Pr: u # ;
    +V+Sg+Fu: ^šu # ;
    +V+Pl+Pa: ^^ām # ;
    +V+Pl+Pr: ām # ;
    +V+Pl+Fu: ^sim # ;
